Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Computation, corporations. new text begin (a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, new text end the franchise tax imposed upon corporations shall be computed by applying to their taxable income the deleted text begin ratedeleted text end new text begin greaternew text end ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end 9.8 percentnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) the rate calculated under paragraph (c)new text end . new text begin (b) Pursuant to enactment of legislation decreasing the corporate franchise tax rate imposed under section 13001(b) of Public Law 115-97, the commissioner must calculate the percentage decrease of the rate imposed under section 11(b) of the Internal Revenue Code as of March 23, 2025, to the rate imposed under section 11(b) of the Internal Revenue Code in the enacted legislation. new text end new text begin (c) Upon the calculation in paragraph (b), the commissioner must calculate the tax rate that applies under paragraph (a), clause (2). The rate equals 9.8 percent, increased by a percentage equal to the percentage decrease in paragraph (b), rounded to the nearest twentieth of a percent. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end